Hawaii statutes.
[§321-381] Biennial renewal; failure
to renew. The biennial renewal fee shall be paid to the department of
health on or before December 31 of each even-numbered year. Failure,
neglect, or refusal of any licensee to pay the biennial renewal fee on or before
such date shall constitute a forfeiture of the license. [L 1990, c 285,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next